Illinois, session 104th, HB2458.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. This Act is in response to the Illinois Supreme 5Court opinion in Cammacho v. City of Joliet, 2024 IL 129263, 6and serves to clarify that Division 2.1 of Article 1 of the 7Illinois Municipal Code divests a home rule municipality of 8jurisdiction to hold administrative hearings to determine 9whether its ordinances have been violated or to impose a fine 10in accordance with its ordinances for (i) any offense under 11the Illinois Vehicle Code that is a traffic regulation 12governing the movement of vehicles or is a reportable offense 13under Section 6-204 of the Illinois Vehicle Code or (ii) a 14similar offense under a municipal ordinance. This Act also 15serves to specifically provide that the exceptions set forth 16in the definition of "system of administrative adjudication" 17in subsection (c) of Section 5-43010 of the Counties Code 18provide a basis to divest a county of jurisdiction to hold an 19administrative hearing to determine whether its ordinances 20have been violated or to impose a fine in accordance with its 21ordinances for (i) any offense under the Illinois Vehicle Code 22that is a traffic regulation governing the movement of 23vehicles or is a reportable offense under Section 6-204 of the 24Illinois Vehicle Code or (ii) a similar offense under a county   HB2458 Engrossed- 2 -LRB104 06291 RTM 16326 b1ordinance. 2    Section 5. The Counties Code is amended by changing 3Section 5-43010 as follows: 4    (55 ILCS 5/5-43010)5    Sec. 5-43010. Administrative adjudication of code and 6ordinance violations; definitions. 7    (a) Any county may provide by ordinance for a system of 8administrative adjudication of county code violations to the 9extent permitted by the Illinois Constitution.10    (b) Any county may provide by ordinance for a system of 11administrative adjudication of violations of ordinances 12enacted by a participating unit of local government only 13where: (i) the unit of local government is engaging in 14governmental activities or providing services within the 15boundaries of the county; (ii) the unit of local government 16has no system of administrative adjudication; and (iii) the 17violation occurred within the boundaries of the county.18    (b-5) Counties, including home rule counties, may not use 19a system of administrative adjudication to adjudicate (i) any 20offense under the Illinois Vehicle Code that is a traffic 21regulation governing the movement of vehicles or is a 22reportable offense under Section 6-204 of the Illinois Vehicle 23Code or (ii) a similar offense under a county ordinance. This 24subsection is a denial and limitation of home rule powers and   HB2458 Engrossed- 3 -LRB104 06291 RTM 16326 b1functions under subsection (g) of Section 6 of Article VII of 2the Illinois Constitution.3    (c) As used in this Division:4    "Participating unit of local government" means a unit of 5local government which has entered into an intergovernmental 6agreement or contract with a county for the administrative 7adjudication of violations of its ordinances by the county 8pursuant to this Division. 9    "System of administrative adjudication" means the 10adjudication of any violation of a county ordinance or of a 11participating unit of local government's ordinance, except for 12(i) proceedings not within the statutory or the home rule 13authority of counties or a participating unit of local 14government; and (ii) any offense under the Illinois Vehicle 15Code (or a similar offense that is a traffic regulation 16governing the movement of vehicles and except for any 17reportable offense under Section 6-204 of the Illinois Vehicle 18Code). 19    "Unit of local government" has the meaning as defined in 20the Illinois Constitution of 1970 and also includes a 21not-for-profit corporation organized for the purpose of 22conducting public business including, but not limited to, the 23Northeast Illinois Regional Commuter Railroad Corporation. 24(Source: P.A. 99-754, eff. 1-1-17.) 25    Section 10. The Illinois Municipal Code is amended by   HB2458 Engrossed- 4 -LRB104 06291 RTM 16326 b1changing Section 1-2.1-10 as follows: 2    (65 ILCS 5/1-2.1-10)3    Sec. 1-2.1-10. Impact on home rule authority. 4    (a) Except as provided under subsection (b), this This 5Division shall not preempt municipalities from adopting other 6systems of administrative adjudication pursuant to their home 7rule powers.8    (b) Municipalities, including home rule municipalities, 9may not use a system of administrative adjudication to 10adjudicate (i) any offense under the Illinois Vehicle Code 11that is a traffic regulation governing the movement of 12vehicles or a reportable offense under Section 6-204 of the 13Illinois Vehicle Code or (ii) a similar offense under a 14municipal ordinance. This subsection is a denial and 15limitation of home rule powers and functions under subsection 16(g) of Section 6 of Article VII of the Illinois Constitution.17(Source: P.A. 90-516, eff. 1-1-98.)